Louisiana, session 2026, HB63.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
7 Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 331(G) is hereby repealed in its
8 entirety.
DIGEST
The digest printed below was prepared by House Legislative Services. It constitutes no part
of the legislative instrument. The keyword, one-liner, abstract, and digest do not constitute
part of the law or proof or indicia of legislative intent. [R.S. 1:13(B) and 24:177(E)]
HB 63 Original 2026 Regular Session Horton
Abstract: Removes the procedure for the placement of a defendant's name in the National
Crime Information Center registry.
Present law (C.Cr.P. Art. 331) provides for discharge of bail obligations.
Proposed law retains present law.
Present law (C.Cr.P. Art. 331(G)) permits a surety to request that the officer originally
charged with the detention of a defendant place the name of the defendant into the National
Crime Information Center (NCIC) registry any time after the defendant's failure to appear
and the warrant of arrest has been issued.
Present law requires the officer to determine if the placement of the name is authorized by
the NCIC registry within 30 days of the request.
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-518 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 63
Present law provides for notice to the surety of the reason for nonplacement if the placement
is not authorized. Further provides for a $25 processing fee that is payable to the officer if
placement is authorized and provides for the removal of the defendant's name from the NCIC
registry without cause during the period provided for surrendering the defendant.
Present law provides for the suspension of the period for filing a rule to show cause under
present law (C.Cr.P. Art. 335) until the name of the defendant is placed back in the registry.
Proposed law repeals present law.
(Repeals C.Cr.P. Art. 331(G))
Page 2 of 2